Wyoming statutes. Title 35 Public Health and Safety
Article 1. In General

§ 35-1-101.
Local contributions; disposition.

All monies paid to the state treasurer representing contributions by city councils, county commissioners, trustees of school districts, or other public agencies, for public health purposes, shall be set up and designated on the books of the state treasurer in a separate account, and shall be expended and disbursed upon warrants drawn by the state auditor against said account when the vouchers therefor have been approved by the department of health.

History.

Laws 1943, ch. 2, § 1; C.S. 1945, § 63-103; W.S. 1957, § 35-1; Laws 1973, ch. 245, § 3; 1974, ch. 16, § 2; 1991, ch. 221, § 2; 2005, ch. 231, § 1.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, deleted “within the trust and agency fund” following “a separate account.”

Editor's notes. —

The basic act for regulation of public health is ch. 55, Laws 1901. This original act was amended and new sections were added by ch. 94, Laws 1903; ch. 99, Laws 1909; and ch. 160, Laws 1921. Chapter 55, Laws 1901, as thus supplemented, has also been amended by ch. 72, Laws 1913; ch. 33, Laws 1923; ch. 73, Laws 1931; ch. 100, Laws 1931; ch. 3, Laws 1939; ch. 7, Laws 1943; ch. 67, Laws 1947; ch. 34, Laws 1953; ch. 20, Laws 1957; ch. 135, Laws 1961; ch. 207, Laws 1961; ch. 37, Laws 1965; ch. 82, Laws 1967; ch. 218, Laws 1969; and ch. 134, Laws 1973.

In addition to the above-mentioned acts, this title includes, in their appropriate places, many statutes not expressly enacted as amendatory of or supplemental to the basic act, but nevertheless relating to public health.

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2005, ch. 231, § 3, directs: “The provisions of this act shall supersede the provisions of any other bill enacted into law during the 2005 general session which amends or references accounts or funds to the extent any other enactment is inconsistent with the establishment of the funds and accounts created under this act. The state auditor shall account for any fund or account created in any other legislation enacted in the 2005 general session in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles (GAAP) as promulgated by the governmental accounting standards board (GASB) and in accordance with this act.”

§ 35-1-102.
Sanitation of public institutions.

It shall be the duty of the officers, managers, superintendents, proprietors and lessees of all hospitals, asylums, infirmaries, prisons, jails, schools, theaters, public places and public institutions to remedy any and all defects relating to the unsanitary condition of such institution, or institutions, as may be under their control, when such defects shall have been called to their attention in writing by the department of health.

History.

Laws 1901, ch. 55, § 14; C.S. 1910, § 2941; C.S. 1920, § 3604; R.S. 1931, § 103-213; C.S. 1945, § 63-119; W.S. 1957, § 35-2; Laws 1991, ch. 221, § 2.

Cross references. —

As to sanitary information generally, see §

35-1-222

.

§ 35-1-103.
Neglect or failure of officials to perform duty.

Any member of the department of health, any county health officer, or any officer, superintendent, or principal of any city, town, county or institution named in this act, who shall fail or neglect to perform any of the duties herein required of them, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and upon conviction thereof shall be fined in the sum of not less than one hundred dollars ($100.00) nor more than one thousand dollars ($1,000.00), or shall be confined in the county jail for a period of not less than six (6) months, nor more than a year, or both.

History.

Laws 1901, ch. 55, § 22; C.S. 1910, § 2949; C.S. 1920, § 3612; R.S. 1931, § 103-221; C.S. 1945, § 63-128; W.S. 1957, § 35-3; 1991, ch. 221, § 2.

Meaning of “this act.” —

As to meaning of “this act,” see Editor's note to §

35-1-101

.

§ 35-1-104.
Applicability of provisions; exceptions.

This act shall not apply to publications, advertisements or notices of the United States government, the state of Wyoming or of any city in the state of Wyoming.

History.

Laws 1921, ch. 160, § 20; R.S. 1931, § 103-231; C.S. 1945, § 63-136; W.S. 1957, § 35-4.

Meaning of “this act.” —

As to meaning of “this act,” see Editor's note to §

35-1-101

.

§ 35-1-105.
Prohibited acts; penalty for violations.

No person, corporation or other organization nor representative thereof shall:

Willfully violate, disobey or disregard the provisions of the public health laws of Wyoming or the terms of any lawful notice, order, rule or regulation issued pursuant thereto;

Repealed by Laws 1982, ch. 75, § 5.

Being a person charged by law or rule of the department of health with the duty of reporting the existence of disease or other facts and statistics relating to the public health, fail to make or file such reports as required by law or requirement of the department;

Conduct a business or activity for which the department requires a certificate or permit without such a certificate or permit;

Willfully and falsely make or alter any certificate or certified copy thereof issued pursuant to public health laws of Wyoming;

Knowingly transport or accept for transportation, interment or other disposition a dead human body without an accompanying permit issued in accordance with the public health laws of Wyoming or the rules of the department; or

Being the owner or occupant of private property upon which there shall exist a nuisance, source of filth or cause of sickness, willfully fail to remove the same at his own expense within forty-eight (48) hours after being ordered to do so by health authorities.

Upon conviction of any of the offenses prohibited in subsection (a) of this section, the violator shall be fined not to exceed one hundred dollars ($100.00) or imprisonment not to exceed six (6) months, or both, and shall be liable for all expense incurred by health authorities in removing the nuisance, source of filth or cause of sickness. No conviction under the penalty provisions of this act or of any other public health laws shall relieve any person from an action in damages for injury resulting from violation of public health laws.

History.

Laws 1947, ch. 67, § 11; W.S. 1957, § 34-5; Laws 1961, ch. 207, § 1; 1982, ch. 75, § 5; 1983, ch. 171, § 3; 1991, ch. 221, § 2; 2012, ch. 98, § 1; 2017 ch. 172, § 1, effective July 1, 2017.

Cross references. —

For duty of state and local officers to report dangers to public health, see §

35-1-223

.

For provisions concerning certificates and permits regarding vital records, see §§

35-1-401

to

35-1-431

.

For provisions concerning reporting of communicable and venereal diseases, see §§

35-4-101

to

35-4-111

.

For present provisions as to bribery, see §

6-5-102

.

For provisions of criminal procedure relative to nuisances, see §§

6-6-201

to

6-6-209

.

The 2012 amendment,

in the introductory language of (a), substituted “No” for “Any,” “nor” for “and each” and “shall” for “who”; in (a)(i), deleted “Shall” at the beginning, and “or” at the end; in (a)(iii), deleted “shall” preceding “fail” and “or who” at the end; rewrote (a)(iv), which read: “Conducting a business or activity over which the department shall possess the power of certification and regulations, and who shall be required to have a certificate or permit therefor, shall conduct such business or activity without such a certificate or permit; or”; in (a)(v), deleted “Shall” at the beginning and “or” at the end; in (a)(vi), deleted “Shall” at the beginning and “who” at the end; in (a)(vii), deleted “shall” preceding “wilfully”; and in (b), inserted “of any of the offenses prohibited in subsection (a) of this section, the violator,” substituted “both, and” for “shall be both so fined and imprisoned, and in addition to such fine and imprisonment” and made stylistic changes.

Laws 2012, ch. 98 § 4, makes
the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary
for a bill to become law as provided by
art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 15, 2012.

The 2017 amendment

, effective July 1, 2017, in (a)(i), (a)(v), and (a)(vii), made stylistic changes.

Meaning of “this act.” —

As to meaning of “this act,” see Editor's note to §

35-1-101

.

Severability. —

Section 15, ch. 67, Laws 1947, reads: “If any particular section or provision of this act is held to be invalid, the invalidation of such section or provision shall not invalidate the other sections and provisions, but they shall have the same force and effect as though they were enacted separately and independently.”

§ 35-1-106.
Penalty for violations.

Any person who shall violate any of the provisions of this act, or any lawful rule or regulation made by the state department of health pursuant to the authority herein granted, or who shall fail or refuse to obey any lawful order issued by any state, county or municipal health officer pursuant to the authority granted in this act shall be deemed guilty of misdemeanor, and shall be punished except as otherwise provided therein by a fine of not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000.00), or by imprisonment for not more than one (1) year or by both such fine and imprisonment.

History.

Laws 1921, ch. 160, § 27; R.S. 1931, § 103-238; C.S. 1945, § 63-143; W.S. 1957, § 35-6; Laws 1991, ch. 221, § 2.

Cross references. —

As to authority to make rules and regulations, see §

35-1-229

.

Meaning of “this act.” —

As to meaning of “this act,” see Editor's note to §

35-1-101

.

Repealing clauses. —

Sections 28 and 29, ch. 160, Laws 1921, repealed all laws and parts of laws in conflict therewith, and expressly repealed §§ 3592 and 3617, C.S. 1920.

Cited

in

Distad v. Cubin, 633 P.2d 167,

1981 Wyo. LEXIS 370

(Wyo. 1981).